Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10.5
PARENTING TIME ENFORCEMENT ACT

Section

14-10.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Parenting Time Enforcement Act".

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 972, § 2, effective August 6.

14-10.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that in most situations it is important to the healthy development of children that the children spend quality time with both parents. The general assembly further finds that due to dissolution of marriage, legal separation, and children born to single parents, families are often divided. As a result, many children do not have the opportunity to spend the time with both parents that a court may have determined is in their best interests.

The general assembly further finds that the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, allows states to seek grants of federal funds for the establishment and administration of programs and to support and facilitate children's access to time with their noncustodial parent.

It is the purpose of this article to enhance children's opportunities for access to their parent with whom the child does not reside the majority of the time pursuant to court order in compliance with any orders entered in that regard. To that end, the general assembly hereby determines that it is appropriate for the state to seek the federal grant described in section 391 of the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, in order to explore alternative methods by which to support and facilitate a child's access to and time with his or her parent with whom the child does not reside the majority of the time in contested parenting time proceedings.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 972, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 1400, § 47, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-095), ch. 96, p. 754, § 9, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-095, see section 1 of chapter 96, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

14-10.5-103. Definition. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 973, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 1400, § 48, effective February 1, 1999.

14-10.5-104. Parenting time enforcement program - authorization.

The appropriate state agency, as determined by the governor, is hereby authorized to develop a parenting time enforcement program. The program, if developed, shall comply with all requirements and restrictions, if any, set forth in federal law or in federal regulation promulgated by the secretary of the federal department of health and human services and, if in compliance with federal law and regulation, shall address the enhancement and facilitation of children's access to the parents with whom such children reside less than the majority of the time by any one or any combination of the following methods:

Mediation, both voluntary and mandatory;

Family counseling;

Parental education;

Development of parenting plans;

Parenting time enforcement procedures, including monitored parenting time, supervised parenting time, or neutral drop-off and pickup locations;

Parenting time guidelines;

Alternative arrangements with respect to parental responsibilities.

The parenting time enforcement program, if developed, may be operated on a statewide basis or on a representative pilot basis.

The selected state agency shall monitor, evaluate, and report on the parenting time enforcement program, if developed, in accordance with the regulations prescribed by the secretary of the federal department of health and human services. Such agency shall also evaluate and report on the effectiveness of the amendments made to section 14-10-129.5, as contained in House Bill 97-1164.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 973, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 98:

IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(VII) amended, p. 1400, § 49, effective February 1, 1999.